Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0433.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 1509. (1) By not later than July 1, 2027, the department of health and human services shall develop, and provide to the department, an informational notice in English, Spanish, and Arabic, containing all of the following: (a) Information on the dangers of tobacco products, vapor products, alternative nicotine products, THC cannabis products, and synthetic intoxicating hemp. (b) Resources to support prevention and treatment. (c) Information on how to recognize the signs of THC poisoning and the proper steps to take if an individual is showing signs of THC poisoning. (2) The department of health and human services shall annually update the informational notice developed under subsection (1) to account for any changes in health education or medical research related to the dangers of tobacco products, vapor products, alternative nicotine products, THC cannabis products, or synthetic intoxicating hemp, and shall provide the updated notice to the department by not later than July 1 of each year. (3) The department shall provide the informational notices described in subsections (1) and (2) to public schools and nonpublic schools and post the informational notices on the departmentâs website. (4) Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, the board of a school district or intermediate school district, board of directors of a public school academy, or governing body of a nonpublic school shall ensure that the informational notices described in subsections (1) and (2), as applicable, are provided to the parent or legal guardian of each pupil enrolled in the school district, intermediate school district, public school academy, or nonpublic school by not later than October 1 of each year. (5) Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, the board of a school district or intermediate school district, board of directors of a public school academy, or governing body of a nonpublic school shall post a link to the department webpage described in subsection (3) on the website of the school district, intermediate school district, public school academy, or nonpublic school. (6) An informational notice described in this section may be sent electronically or by mail. (7) The department, the department of health and human services, a school district, an intermediate school district, a public school academy, a nonpublic school, and any officers, board members, or employees of those institutions are immune from civil liability, both personally and professionally, for any damages allegedly caused by, arising out of, or relating to the informational notice developed under this section. (8) As used in this section: (a) âAlternative nicotine productâ means that term as defined in section 4 of the youth tobacco act, 1915 PA 31, MCL 722.644. (b) âTHCâ means that term as defined in section 3 of the Michigan Regulation and Taxation of Marihuana Act, 2018 IL 1, MCL 333.27953. (c) âTobacco productâ means that term as defined in section 4 of the youth tobacco act, 1915 PA 31, MCL 722.644. (d) âVapor productâ means that term as defined in section 4 of the youth tobacco act, 1915 PA 31, MCL 722.644. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Secretary of the Senate Clerk of the House of Representatives Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor